Missouri, session 2026, HB2569.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 590.653, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 590.653, to read as follows:
590.653. 1. Each city, county and city not within a county may establish a civilian
review board, division of civilian oversight, or any other entity which provides civilian
review or oversight of police agencies, or may use an existing civilian review board or
division of civilian oversight or other named entity which has been appointed by the local
governing body, with the authority to investigate allegations of misconduct by local law
enforcement officers towards members of the public. The members shall not receive
compensation but shall receive reimbursement from the local governing body for all
reasonable and necessary expenses.
2. The board, division, or any other such entity, shall have the power solely limited to
receiving, investigating, making findings, and recommending disciplinary action upon
complaints by members of the public against members of the police department that allege
misconduct involving excessive use of force, abuse of authority, discourtesy, or use of
offensive language, including, but not limited to, slurs relating to race, ethnicity, religion,
gender, sexual orientation, and disability. The findings and recommendations of the board,
division, or other entity and the basis therefor, shall be submitted to the chief law enforcement
official. No finding or recommendation shall be based solely upon an unsworn complaint or
statement, nor shall prior unsubstantiated, unfounded or withdrawn complaints be the basis
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2569 2
for any such findings or recommendations. Only the powers specifically granted herein are
authorized and any and all authority granted to future or existing boards, divisions, or entities
outside the scope of the powers listed herein are expressly preempted and void as a matter of
law.
3. The provisions of subsection 2 of this section shall not apply to any city with
more than one hundred twenty-five thousand but fewer than one hundred sixty
thousand inhabitants and any such city may establish such board, division, or any other
such entity and may grant to such board, division, or any other entity the power to
receive, investigate, make findings, and recommend disciplinary action upon complaints
by members of the public against members of the police department.
✔